Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-250
Wills; judgment in partition; decree in equity; certificate of dissolution of marriage; recording; how indexed.

On recording any will, exemplification, decree, or certificate of dissolution of marriage, the register of deeds shall index the same in the indices of deeds, and as nearly as may be as deeds are indexed, placing the name of the devisor, petitioner, or plaintiff, with the grantors, and the devisee, respondent, or defendant with the grantees.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 27, p. 286;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 20, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6222;

C.S.1922, § 5621;

C.S.1929, § 76-227;

R.S.1943, § 76-250;

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 35.